District of Columbia statutes.
31-1702

Approval as a domestic insurer.

Any insurer which is organized under laws of any state and is admitted to do business in the District for the purpose of writing insurance may become a domestic insurer by complying with all of the requirements of law relative to the organization and licensing of a domestic insurer of the same type and by designating its principal place of business at a place in the District. The domestic insurer shall be entitled to like certificates and licenses to transact business in the District, and shall be subject to the authority and jurisdiction of the District.

May 24, 1996, D.C. Law 11-127, § 3, 43 DCR 1559

History

1981 Ed., § 35-4302.

Prior Codifications